Wyoming, session 2025, HB0274.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 1-39-124 is created to read:

1-39-124. Liability; female sports.

HB0274

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0397
A governmental entity is liable for damages resulting from
a violation of W.S. 21-25-102 caused by the negligent,
reckless or intentional acts of public employees while
acting within the scope of their duties.

Section 2. W.S. 21-25-101(a)(ii) and (iii) and
21-25-102(e)(i), (ii) and by creating new subsections (g)
through (k) are amended to read:

21-25-101. Definitions.

(a) As used in this chapter:

(ii) "Interscholastic athletic activity" means
that a student represents the student's school in a Wyoming
high school activities association sanctioned sport or a
sport played at the collegiate level for which eligibility
requirements for participation by a student athlete are
established by a national association for the promotion or
regulation of collegiate athletics;

(iii) "School" means a school consisting of
grades seven (7) through 12 (twelve), or any combination of
HB0274

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0397
grades within this range, as determined by the plan of
organization by the school district board of trustees and
any institution of higher education;

21-25-102. Participation in school athletic
activities.

(e) A government entity, any licensing or any
athletic association shall not retaliate or take any
adverse action against:

(i) A school for maintaining separate athletic
teams or sports for students of the female sex; or

(ii) A student if the student or the parent or
guardian of a student requests a contested case pursuant to
subsection (f) of this section or that reports a violation
of this section to an employee or representative of the
school or athletic association or files an action for
damages pursuant to subsection (h) of this section.

(g) No government entity, any licensing or any
athletic association shall discharge or in any manner
HB0274

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0397
discriminate against any employee because the employee has
instituted, or caused to be instituted, any proceeding
under or related to this section or has testified or is
about to testify in any proceeding, or because of the
exercise by the employee on behalf of himself or others any
right afforded by this section.

(h) Any student or a parent or guardian of a student
who is harmed by a violation of this chapter shall have a
private cause of action for injunctive relief, damages,
attorney fees and any other relief available under law
against the school, government entity, licensing or
accrediting organization, athletic association or athletic
organization violating this chapter.

(j) Any school that suffers any direct or indirect
harm as a result of a violation of this chapter shall have
a private cause of action for injunctive relief, damages,
attorney fees and any other relief available under law
against the government entity, licensing or accrediting
organization, athletic association or athletic organization
violating this chapter.

HB0274

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0397
(k) A civil action commenced under subsections (h) or
(j) of this section shall be brought not later than three
(3) years after the violation of this chapter occurred.

Section 3. W.S. 16-4-405(a)(xiii) and 21-25-201
through 21-25-204 are repealed.

Section 4. This act is effective July 1, 2025.

(END)
HB0274